Massachusetts, session 194th, S1227.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Chapter 111 of the General Laws, as so appearing, is hereby amended by inserting the
following new section:-
“Section 183A.
(a) Definitions:
“Coercion” is the intimidation of an individual with the intent to compel them to do an
act against his or her will by the use of psychological pressure, physical force, or threats and
includes requiring an individual to accept or undergo a health-related intervention as a condition
of 3

of hiring or continued employment; access to education; or participation in daycare, travel,
religion, hobbies, entertainment, or sports.
“Health-related intervention” includes but is not limited to medical treatments or
procedures, testing, physical or mental examination, vaccination or immunization, genetic
procedure, experimental procedures and protocols, collection of specimens, participation in
tracking or tracing programs, the wearing of masks, the maintaining of measured distance from
other humans and animals that is not otherwise unlawful, the involuntary sharing of personal
data or medical information, and other recommended or mandated countermeasures.
"Genetic procedure" includes any therapy, treatment, or medical procedure that is
intended to: (a) add, remove, alter, activate, change, or cause mutation in an individual's DNA;
or (b) replace, supersede, or bypass a normal DNA function.
(b) Fundamental right: based on the constitutions of the United States and the
commonwealth of Massachusetts, persons have a fundamental right to bodily autonomy and self-
determination in making health decisions for themselves and their minor children.
(c) No person may be mandated, required, or coerced by any public or private entity or
person to accept any health-related intervention, except as allowed by subdivision (f) of this
Section. This Subdivision (c) shall apply regardless of any other state or federal laws or orders or
emergency.
(d) A person whose rights under this Act have been violated may bring action for:
(i) an injunction against any further violation;
(ii) damages incurred as a result of any violation;
of 3

(iii) punitive damages in the case of willful violation of this Act;
(iv) violation of Title 42 USC 1983 in the case of willful violation of this Act; and
(v) in employment-related cases, admission to or reinstatement of employment with back
pay plus 10 percent interest, in addition to any other damages.
(e) In the case of any successful action to seek relief under this Act, the costs of the
action, including but not limited to reasonable legal fee as determined by the court, shall be
awarded in addition to damages.
(f) Nothing in this Act shall preclude:
(i) drug or alcohol testing;
(ii) a health-related intervention that is a bona fide occupational requirement, excluding
any vaccination, immunization, or gene therapy;
(iii) any medical testing legally required for issuance of any vehicular license; or
(iv) any health-related intervention allowed under Section 12 of Chapter 123 of the
Massachusetts General Laws relating to admission of an individual to a general or psychiatric
hospital for psychiatric evaluation and, potentially, treatment.”
of 3